Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3002
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) National
statistics show that one in four Americans will face a mental illness in his
or her lifetime;

(2) Mental health first aid builds an understanding of how mental
illness affects Nebraskans, provides an overview of common treatments, and
teaches basic skills for providing assistance to a person who may be developing
symptoms or experiencing a crisis;

(3) A mental health first aid program is
an education program recognized on the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services
Administration's National Registry of Evidence-based Programs and Practices;
and

(4)
The Behavioral Health Education Center administered by the University of Nebraska
Medical Center has conducted a series of mental health first aid training
courses and the experience of providing such courses may be utilized regarding
the implementation of a mental health first aid training program as prescribed
by the Nebraska Mental Health First Aid Training Act.

Laws 2014, LB901, § 3.